algorithms/yiddish_urieli.sbl
/*
 * Yiddish language stemmer
 *
 * Source obtained from https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/greek/stemmer.html, under the BSD
 * public license, created by Assaf Urieli in 2020.
 */

/* *******************************************
 * Stemmer for Yiddish language in YIVO script
 *
 * Author: Assaf Urieli
 * Emails: assaf.urieli at gmail.com
 * Version: 0.1 (15.05.2020)
 *
 ********************************************* */

routines (
       prelude
       mark_regions
       R1
       R1plus3
       standard_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 x )

groupings ( vowel niked alefBeys consonant )

stringescapes {}

// AlefBeys
stringdef Alef         '{U+05D0}'
stringdef Beys         '{U+05D1}'
stringdef Giml         '{U+05D2}'
stringdef Dalet        '{U+05D3}'
stringdef Hey          '{U+05D4}'
stringdef Vov          '{U+05D5}'
stringdef Zayen        '{U+05D6}'
stringdef Khes         '{U+05D7}'
stringdef Tes          '{U+05D8}'
stringdef Yud          '{U+05D9}'
stringdef LangerKhof   '{U+05DA}'
stringdef Khof         '{U+05DB}'
stringdef Lamed        '{U+05DC}'
stringdef ShlosMem     '{U+05DD}'
stringdef Mem          '{U+05DE}'
stringdef LangerNun    '{U+05DF}'
stringdef Nun          '{U+05E0}'
stringdef Samekh       '{U+05E1}'
stringdef Ayen         '{U+05E2}'
stringdef LangerFey    '{U+05E3}'
stringdef Fey          '{U+05E4}'
stringdef LangerTsadek '{U+05E5}'
stringdef Tsadek       '{U+05E6}'
stringdef Kuf          '{U+05E7}'
stringdef Reysh        '{U+05E8}'
stringdef Shin         '{U+05E9}'
stringdef Sof          '{U+05EA}'
stringdef TsveyVovn    '{U+05F0}'
stringdef VovYud       '{U+05F1}'
stringdef TsveyYudn    '{U+05F2}'

// Niked
stringdef Shvo          '{U+05B0}'
stringdef Khirik        '{U+05B4}'
stringdef Tseyre        '{U+05B5}'
stringdef Segl          '{U+05B6}'
stringdef ReducedSegl   '{U+05B1}'
stringdef Pasekh        '{U+05B7}'
stringdef ReducedPasekh '{U+05B2}'
stringdef Komets        '{U+05B8}'
stringdef ReducedKomets '{U+05B3}'
stringdef Rafe          '{U+05BF}'
stringdef SinDot        '{U+05C2}'
stringdef ShinDot       '{U+05C1}'
stringdef Khoylm        '{U+05B9}'
stringdef Melupm        '{U+05BC}'
stringdef Kubuts        '{U+05BB}'

// Groupings
define niked       '{Shvo}{Khirik}{Tseyre}{Segl}{ReducedSegl}{Pasekh}{ReducedPasekh}{Komets}{ReducedKomets}{SinDot}{ShinDot}{Khoylm}{Melupm}{Kubuts}{Rafe}'
define alefBeys    '{Alef}{Beys}{Giml}{Dalet}{Hey}{Vov}{Zayen}{Khes}{Tes}{Yud}{LangerKhof}{Khof}{Lamed}{ShlosMem}{Mem}{LangerNun}{Nun}{Samekh}{Ayen}{LangerFey}{Fey}{LangerTsadek}{Tsadek}{Kuf}{Reysh}{Shin}{Sof}{TsveyVovn}{VovYud}{TsveyYudn}'
define vowel           '{Alef}{Vov}{Yud}{Ayen}{VovYud}{TsveyYudn}'
define consonant   alefBeys - vowel

define prelude as (
  do (
    repeat goto (
      [substring] among (
        '{Vov}{Vov}' ( not '{Melupm}' <- '{TsveyVovn}' )
        '{Vov}{Yud}' ( not '{Khirik}' <- '{VovYud}' )
        '{Yud}{Yud}' ( not '{Khirik}' <- '{TsveyYudn}' )
        '{LangerKhof}' ( <- '{Khof}')
        '{ShlosMem}' ( <- '{Mem}' )
        '{LangerNun}' ( <- '{Nun}' )
        '{LangerFey}' ( <- '{Fey}' )
        '{LangerTsadek}' ( <- '{Tsadek}' )
      )
    )
  )

  do (repeat goto ( [niked] delete ))
)

define mark_regions as (
  $p1 = limit

  (
    try (
      // Replace past participle ge- at start of word
      // Unless word starts with gelt- or gebn-
      ['{Giml}{Ayen}']
      not ('{Lamed}{Tes}' or '{Beys}{Nun}') <- 'GE'
    )

    try (
      // skip verbal prefix
      among(
        // Free stressed: Adurkh-, Durkh-, Ahin-, Aher-, Avek-, Mit-, Antkegn-, Akegn-, Anider-, Arop-, Aroys-, Aroyf-, Arum-, Arayn-, Arunter-, Ariber-, Nokh-, Farbay-, Aheym-, Afir-, Faroys-, Funander-, Tsuzamen-, Tsunoyf-, Tsurik-
        '{Alef}{Dalet}{Vov}{Reysh}{Khof}' '{Dalet}{Vov}{Reysh}{Khof}' '{Alef}{Hey}{Yud}{Nun}' '{Alef}{Hey}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Alef}{TsveyVovn}{Ayen}{Kuf}' '{Mem}{Yud}{Tes}' '{Alef}{Nun}{Tes}{Kuf}{Ayen}{Giml}{Nun}' '{Alef}{Kuf}{Ayen}{Giml}{Nun}' '{Alef}{Nun}{Yud}{Dalet}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{Alef}{Fey}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{VovYud}{Samekh}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{VovYud}{Fey}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{Vov}{Mem}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Nun}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{Vov}{Nun}{Tes}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Alef}{Reysh}{Yud}{Beys}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Nun}{Alef}{Khof}' '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}{Beys}{TsveyYudn}' '{Alef}{Hey}{TsveyYudn}{Mem}' '{Alef}{Fey}{Yud}{Reysh}' '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}{VovYud}{Samekh}' '{Fey}{Vov}{Nun}{Alef}{Nun}{Dalet}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Tsadek}{Vov}{Zayen}{Alef}{Mem}{Ayen}{Nun}' '{Tsadek}{Vov}{Nun}{VovYud}{Fey}' '{Tsadek}{Vov}{Reysh}{Yud}{Kuf}'

        // Stressed: Oys-, Oyf-, Um-, Unter-, Iber-, Ayn-, On-, Op-, Bay-, For-, Tsu-.
        '{Alef}{VovYud}{Samekh}' '{Alef}{VovYud}{Fey}' '{Alef}{Vov}{Mem}' '{Alef}{Vov}{Nun}{Tes}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Alef}{Yud}{Beys}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Alef}{TsveyYudn}{Nun}' '{Alef}{Nun}' '{Alef}{Fey}' '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}' '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}' '{Tsadek}{Vov}'

        // Unstressed:  Ant-, Ba-, Der-, Tse-. Far- already covered by For-. Ge- comes later.
        '{Alef}{Nun}{Tes}' '{Beys}{Alef}' '{Dalet}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Tsadek}{Ayen}'

        // If verbal prefix followed by Tsu- or Ge-, replace it
        (
          // Don't mark the TSU- prefix inside verbs like "oys-tsugn"
          test (('{Tsadek}{Vov}{Giml}{Nun}' or '{Tsadek}{Vov}{Kuf}{Tes}' or '{Tsadek}{Vov}{Kuf}{Nun}') atlimit)
          or
          // Don't mark the GE- prefix inside verbs like "avek-gebn"
          test ('{Giml}{Ayen}{Beys}{Nun}')
          or
          ( ['{Giml}{Ayen}'] <- 'GE')
          or
          (['{Tsadek}{Vov}'] <- 'TSU')
        )
      )
    )

    test(hop 3 setmark x)

    // We want to allow three-consonant Hebrew roots.
    // To this end, we skip three-consonant combinations that exist in non-Hebraic Yiddish.
    try (
      among(
        '{Shin}{Fey}{Reysh}' '{Shin}{Tes}{Reysh}' '{Shin}{Tes}{Shin}' '{Dalet}{Zayen}{Shin}'
          ( true )
      )
    )

    // Either 3 consonants or the first non-vowel after a vowel
    (
      not (consonant consonant consonant setmark p1)
      goto vowel repeat vowel setmark p1
    )
    try($p1 < x  $p1 = x)  // at least 3 past the prefix
  )

)

backwardmode (
  define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
  // Like R1, but also allows the cursor to be outside R1 by the width of Giml Yud Samekh
  define R1plus3 as $p1 <= cursor + sizeof '{Giml}{Yud}{Samekh}'

  define standard_suffix as (
    do (
      [substring] among(
        // Plural/adjective endings: -er, -ers, -e, -n, -s, -en, -ns, -eners, -ens, -es
         '{Ayen}{Reysh}{Samekh}' '{Ayen}{Nun}' '{Nun}{Samekh}' '{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}{Reysh}{Samekh}' '{Ayen}{Samekh}' '{Ayen}' '{Nun}' '{Samekh}' '{Ayen}{Mem}' '{Ayen}{Reysh}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // Exception: don't delete noun endings -ie, like "agitatsie"
        '{Yud}{Ayen}'
          ( true )

        // -ies => ie
        '{Yud}{Ayen}{Samekh}'
          ( R1  <- '{Yud}{Ayen}'  )

        // Plural/adjective endings: -enem, -ener, -ene, -ens
        '{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}' '{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}{Mem}' '{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Ayen}{Nun}{Samekh}'
          (R1 delete 
            [substring] among (
              // -gegangen => -gey
              '{Giml}{Alef}{Nun}{Giml}' (<- '{Giml}{TsveyYudn}')
              // -genumen => -nem
              '{Nun}{Vov}{Mem}' (<- '{Nun}{Ayen}{Mem}')
              // -gemiten => -mayd
              '{Mem}{Yud}{Tes}' (<- '{Mem}{TsveyYudn}{Dalet}')
              // -gebiten => -bayt
              '{Beys}{Yud}{Tes}' (<- '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}')
              // -gebisen => -bays
              '{Beys}{Yud}{Samekh}' (<- '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}{Samekh}')
              // -gevizen => -vayz
              '{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Zayen}' (<- '{TsveyVovn}{TsveyYudn}{Zayen}')
              // -getriben => -trayb
              '{Tes}{Reysh}{Yud}{Beys}' (<- '{Tes}{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')
              // -geliten => -layt
              '{Lamed}{Yud}{Tes}' (<- '{Lamed}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}')
              // -gekliben => -klayb
              '{Kuf}{Lamed}{Yud}{Beys}' (<- '{Kuf}{Lamed}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')
              // -geriben => -rayb
              '{Reysh}{Yud}{Beys}' (<- '{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')
              // -gerisen => -rays
              '{Reysh}{Yud}{Samekh}' (<- '{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Samekh}')
              // -geshvigen => -shvayg
              '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Giml}' (<- '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{TsveyYudn}{Giml}')
              // -geshmisen => -shmays
              '{Shin}{Mem}{Yud}{Samekh}' (<- '{Shin}{Mem}{TsveyYudn}{Samekh}')
              // -geshniten => -shnayd
              '{Shin}{Nun}{Yud}{Tes}' (<- '{Shin}{Nun}{TsveyYudn}{Dalet}')
              // -geshriben => -shrayb
              '{Shin}{Reysh}{Yud}{Beys}' (<- '{Shin}{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')
              // -gebunden => -bind
              '{Beys}{Vov}{Nun}{Dalet}' (<- '{Beys}{Yud}{Nun}{Dalet}')
              // -gevuntshn => -vintsh
              '{TsveyVovn}{Vov}{Tes}{Shin}' (<- '{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Tes}{Shin}')
              // -gezungen => -zing
              '{Zayen}{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}' (<- '{Zayen}{Yud}{Nun}{Giml}')
              // -getrunken => -trink
              '{Tes}{Reysh}{Vov}{Nun}{Kuf}' (<- '{Tes}{Reysh}{Yud}{Nun}{Kuf}')
              // -getsvungen => -tsving
              '{Tsadek}{TsveyVovn}{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}' (<- '{Tsadek}{TsveyVovn}{Yud}{Nun}{Giml}')
              // -geshlungen => -shling
              '{Shin}{Lamed}{Vov}{Nun}{Giml}' (<- '{Shin}{Lamed}{Yud}{Nun}{Giml}')
              // -geboygen => -beyg
              '{Beys}{VovYud}{Giml}' (<- '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}{Giml}')
              // -gehoyben => -heyb
              '{Hey}{VovYud}{Beys}' (<- '{Hey}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}')
              // -farloyren => -farlir
              '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}{Lamed}{VovYud}{Reysh}' (<- '{Fey}{Alef}{Reysh}{Lamed}{Yud}{Reysh}')
              // -shtanen => -shtey
              '{Shin}{Tes}{Alef}{Nun}' (<- '{Shin}{Tes}{TsveyYudn}')
              // -geshvoyrn => -shver
              '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{VovYud}{Reysh}' (<- '{Shin}{TsveyVovn}{Ayen}{Reysh}')
            )
         )

        // Verb/past participle ending: -t
        '{Tes}'
          ( R1 delete ) 

        // As well as noun/adjectives ending in -tn, -te, -ter, -ts so that the "-t" doesn't differentiate
        // Similarly for past participles: -tns, -tene, -tenem, -tener
        // If the Tes was before R1, we try to perform the same action while leaving the Tes in place
        '{Tes}{Nun}' '{Tes}{Ayen}' '{Tes}{Ayen}{Reysh}' '{Tes}{Samekh}'
        '{Tes}{Nun}{Samekh}' '{Tes}{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}' '{Tes}{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}{Mem}' '{Tes}{Ayen}{Nun}{Ayen}{Reysh}'
          ( ((R1 delete) or ( <- '{Tes}'))
            // -(ge)brakht => -breng
            ['{Beys}{Reysh}{Alef}{Khof}' try '{Giml}{Ayen}'] <- '{Beys}{Reysh}{Ayen}{Nun}{Giml}'
          )

        // Past participles: -et, -etn, -ets, -ete, -eter
        '{Ayen}{Tes}' '{Ayen}{Tes}{Nun}' '{Ayen}{Tes}{Samekh}' '{Ayen}{Tes}{Ayen}' '{Ayen}{Tes}{Ayen}{Reysh}'
          ( R1 delete )

        // -geyn shorted to -gey
        '{Giml}{TsveyYudn}{Nun}'
                    ( <- '{Giml}{TsveyYudn}')

        // ##################### Long list of irregular past participles
        // -(ge)gangen (shortened to -gangen after prefixes) => -gey
        '{Giml}{Alef}{Nun}{Giml}{Ayen}{Nun}'
                    ( <- '{Giml}{TsveyYudn}' )

        // -(ge)numen (shortened to -numen after prefixes) => -nem
        '{Nun}{Vov}{Mem}{Ayen}{Nun}'
          (<- '{Nun}{Ayen}{Mem}' )

        // -(ge)shribn (shortened to -shribn after prefixes) => -shrayb
        '{Shin}{Reysh}{Yud}{Beys}{Nun}'
          (<- '{Shin}{Reysh}{TsveyYudn}{Beys}' )

        // -gemiten => -mayd
        'GE{Mem}{Yud}{Tes}{Nun}' 
          (<- '{Mem}{TsveyYudn}{Dalet}')

        // -gebiten => -bayt
        'GE{Beys}{Yud}{Tes}{Nun}' 
          (<- '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}{Tes}')

        // -gebisen => -bays
        'GE{Beys}{Yud}{Samekh}{Nun}' 
          ( <- '{Beys}{TsveyYudn}{Samekh}')
